Maryland, session 2026, HB0555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 18–1503 through 18–1506 of Article – Education of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 18–1506 through 18–1509, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
18–1502.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0555*

HOUSE BILL 555
(a) There is a program of loan assistance repayment known as the Janet L.
Hoffman Loan Assistance Repayment Program in the State.
(B) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS ARE ELIGIBLE FOR FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE UNDER THE PROGRAM:
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES A GRADUATE, PROFESSIONAL, OR
UNDERGRADUATE DEGREE FROM:
(I) A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY IN THE STATE OF MARYLAND;
(II) A SCHOOL OF LAW IN THE STATE OF MARYLAND; OR
(III) FOR A VETERINARY PRACTITIONER OR VETERINARY
TECHNICIAN, AN ACCREDITED VETERINARY COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY;
(2) A LICENSED CLINICAL ALCOHOL AND DRUG COUNSELOR, A
LICENSED CLINICAL MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY COUNSELOR, OR A LICENSED
CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR WHO IS ELIGIBLE UNDER § 18–1503 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; OR
(3) AN EDUCATION–RELATED PROFESSIONAL WHO QUALIFIES
UNDER § 18–1504 OF THIS SUBTITLE WHO:
(I) RECEIVES A RESIDENT TEACHER LICENSE FROM THE
DEPARTMENT AFTER COMPLETING AN ALTERNATIVE TEACHING PREPARATION
PROGRAM APPROVED BY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT;
(II) FOR A MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL, RECEIVES A
GRADUATE, PROFESSIONAL, OR UNDERGRADUATE DEGREE FROM ANY ACCREDITED
COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY; OR
(III) IS A PUBLIC SCHOOL TEACHER.
REVISOR’S NOTE: Subsection (b)(1) of this section is new language from former §
18–1502(b)(1) of this subtitle added for clarity.
Subsection (b)(1)(iii) of this section is new language derived without
substantive change from former § 18–1502(d) of this subtitle.
Subsection (b)(2) of this section is derived without substantive change from
former § 18–1502(h) of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 555 3
Subsection (b)(3) of this section is derived without substantive change from
former §§ 18–1502(b)(1)(ii) and (c)(1) and (2) of this subtitle.
18–1503.
[(b)] (A) The Office [of Student Financial Assistance] shall assist in the
repayment of the amount of any higher education loan owed by an ELIGIBLE individual
UNDER § 18–1502(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE who:
(1) [(i) Receives a graduate, professional, or undergraduate degree from:
1. A college or university in the State of Maryland;
2. A school of law;
3. For a mental health professional, any accredited college or
university; or
4. For a veterinary practitioner or veterinary technician, any
accredited veterinary college or university; or
(ii) Receives a Resident Teacher Certificate (RTC) from the
Department after completing an alternative teaching preparation program approved by the
State Superintendent;
(2)] Obtains eligible employment;
[(3)] (2) Receives an income that is less than the maximum eligible total
income levels established by the Office, including any additional sources of income; and
[(4)] (3) Satisfies any other criteria established by the Office.
[(c)] (B) Subject to the provisions of [subsection (b)] § 18–1502 of this [section]
SUBTITLE, the Office shall assist in the repayment of the amount of any higher education
loan owed by a VETERINARY PRACTITIONER WHO HAS PROVIDED VETERINARY
SERVICES OR A VETERINARY TECHNICIAN WHO HAS PROVIDED VETERINARY
TECHNICIAN SERVICES AS:
(1) AN EMPLOYEE IN THE STATE FOR A PERIOD NOT LESS THAN 5
YEARS; OR
(2) A VOLUNTEER FOR A MINIMUM OF 100 HOURS PER YEAR FOR A
PERIOD NOT LESS THAN 3 YEARS AT AN ANIMAL SHELTER THAT IS OWNED BY:
(I) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT;

HOUSE BILL 555
(II) AN ORGANIZATION CONTRACTED TO PERFORM ANIMAL
CONTROL SERVICES FOR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT; OR
(III) AN ORGANIZATION THAT SHELTERS ANIMALS AND WAS A
RECIPIENT OF THE MARYLAND SPAY AND NEUTER GRANTS PROGRAM DURING THE
PRIOR YEAR.
(C) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF § 18–1502 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
OFFICE SHALL ASSIST IN THE REPAYMENT OF THE AMOUNT OF ANY HIGHER
EDUCATION LOAN OWED BY A LICENSED CLINICAL ALCOHOL AND DRUG
COUNSELOR, A LICENSED CLINICAL MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY COUNSELOR,
OR A LICENSED CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR WHOSE PRACTICE IS
LOCATED IN A HIGH–NEED GEOGRAPHIC AREA OF THE STATE AS DETERMINED BY
THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section is new language derived without substantive
change from former § 18–1502 of this subtitle.
Subsection (b) of this section is derived without substantive change from
former § 18–1502(d) of this subtitle.
Subsection (c) of this section is derived without substantive change from
former § 18–1502(h) of this subtitle.
The only other changes were in style.
18–1504.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF § 18–1502 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
OFFICE SHALL ASSIST IN THE REPAYMENT OF THE AMOUNT OF ANY HIGHER
EDUCATION LOAN OWED BY AN EDUCATION–RELATED PROFESSIONAL DESCRIBED
IN THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) A GRANT AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE KNOWN AS
THE NANCY GRASMICK PUBLIC SCHOOL PROFESSIONAL AWARD.
(2) A RECIPIENT OF A NANCY GRASMICK PUBLIC SCHOOL
PROFESSIONAL AWARD SHALL BE KNOWN AS A NANCY GRASMICK PUBLIC SCHOOL
PROFESSIONAL SCHOLAR.
(C) [(1) Public] A PUBLIC school teacher in the State [who] QUALIFIES FOR
REPAYMENT UNDER THE PROGRAM IF THE INDIVIDUAL:

HOUSE BILL 555 5
[(i)] (1) Has taught in Maryland for at least 2 years:
[1.] (I) In science, technology, engineering, fine arts, or
math subjects;
[2.] (II) In a school in which at least [the following
percentages of the] 55% OF students are enrolled in the free and reduced price lunch
program in the State[:
A. 75% through June 30, 2025; and
B. 55% beginning July 1, 2025]; or
[3.] (III) In a school that:
[A.] 1. Had Title I status during the 2018–2019 school
year;
[B.] 2. Lost Title I status after the 2018–2019 school year;
and
[C.] 3. Participates in the United States Department of
Agriculture Community Eligibility Provision; and
[(ii)] (2) Has received a performance evaluation rating for the most
recent year available in the county in which the teacher taught[;].
[(2)] (D) [Mental] A MENTAL health professional [who] QUALIFIES FOR
REPAYMENT UNDER THE PROGRAM IF THE INDIVIDUAL has provided mental health
services in a public school for at least 2 years as an employee of:
[(i)] (1) A county school system; or
[(ii)] (2) A local health department through an agreement with a
county board[; or].
[(3)] (E) [Nurse who] A NURSE QUALIFIES FOR REPAYMENT UNDER
THE PROGRAM IF THE INDIVIDUAL has been a school nurse for at least 2 years.
[(d) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the Office shall assist
in the repayment of the amount of any higher education loan owed by:
(1) A veterinarian practitioner who has provided veterinary services as:
(i) An employee in the State for a period not less than 5 years; or

HOUSE BILL 555
(ii) A volunteer for a minimum of 100 hours per year for a period not
less than 3 years at an animal shelter that is owned by:
1. A local government;
2. An organization contracted to perform animal control
services for a local government; or
3. An organization that shelters animals and was a recipient
of the Maryland Spay and Neuter Grants Program during the prior year; or
(2) A veterinary technician who has provided veterinary technician
services as:
(i) An employee in the State for a period not less than 5 years; or
(ii) A volunteer for a minimum of 100 hours per year for a period not
less than 3 years at an animal shelter that is owned by:
1. A local government;
2. An organization contracted to perform animal control
services for a local government; or
3. An organization that shelters animals and was a recipient
of the Maryland Spay and Neuter Grants Program during the prior year.
(e) (1) A grant awarded under subsection (c) of this section shall be known as
the Nancy Grasmick Public School Professional Award.
(2) A recipient of a Nancy Grasmick Public School Professional Award shall
be known as a Nancy Grasmick Public School Professional Scholar.]
REVISOR’S NOTE: Subsection (a) of this section is new language added to clarify
the scope of the section.
Subsection (b) of this section is derived without substantive change from §
18–1502(e) of this subtitle.
Subsection (c) of this section is derived without substantive change from §
18–1502(c)(1) of this subtitle. New subsection (c)(1)(ii) removes obsolete
language and adds “55% of” for clarity.
Subsection (d) of this section is derived without substantive change from §
18–1502(c)(2) of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 555 7
Subsection (e) of this section is derived without substantive change from §
18–1502(c)(3) of this subtitle.
The only other changes were in style.
18–1505.
[(f)] (A) An applicant for assistance in the repayment of a commercial loan shall
demonstrate to the Office that the commercial loan was used for tuition, educational
expenses, or living expenses for graduate or undergraduate study.
[(g)] (B) Assistance in the repayment of a loan from an entity set forth in §
18–1501(c)(2) of this subtitle shall require the approval of the Office.
[(h) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the Office shall assist
in the repayment of the amount of any higher education loan owed by a licensed clinical
alcohol and drug counselor, a licensed clinical marriage and family therapy counselor, or a
licensed clinical professional counselor whose practice is located in a high–need geographic
area of the State as determined by the Maryland Department of Health.]
REVISOR’S NOTE: This section is derived without substantive change from former
§ 18–1502(f) and (g) of this subsection.
The only changes were in style.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that, except as expressly provided in this Act, this Act shall be construed as a
nonsubstantive revision, and may not otherwise be construed to render any substantive
change in the law of the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Revisor’s Notes contained
in this Act are not law and may not be considered to have been enacted as part of this Act.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act or by
any other Act of the General Assembly of 2026 that affects provisions enacted by this Act.
The publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note
following the section affected.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.